Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 53. Eggs and Hatchery Products.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Food, § 3.

§ 3.2-5300.
Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to the marketing of eggs to consumers, institutional consumers, and retailers.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-763.14; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5301.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Consumer”
means any person who acquires eggs for consumption in his own household and not for resale.

“Eggs”
mean eggs in the shell that are the product of domesticated chickens.

“Grade”
means specifications defining the limits of variation in quality of eggs in such a manner as to differentiate among classes of eggs, and the letter, number, or other symbol by which references may be made.

“Institutional consumer”
means a restaurant, hotel, boardinghouse, or any other business, facility, or place in which eggs are prepared or offered as food to patrons, residents, inmates, or patients.

“Market”
means sell, offer for sale, give in the channels of commerce, barter, exchange, or distribute in any manner.

“Processor”
includes any person who cleans, candles, grades, sizes, and packs shell eggs for human consumption.

“Retailer”
means any person who markets eggs to consumers.

“Standard”
means specifications of the physical characteristics or any or all of the component parts of individual eggs.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-763.15; 1972, c. 120; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5302.
Standards, grades, and size-weight classes; cracked or checked eggs; sale of inedible eggs.

The Board shall adopt standards, grades, and size-weight classes including standards for the term “ungraded” for eggs marketed in the Commonwealth. In administering this chapter, the Department shall have due regard for the desirability of uniformity in the standards, grades, and size-weight classes for eggs moving in intrastate and interstate commerce.

Cracked or checked eggs labeled as “cracks” may be sold only by producers or processors directly to consumers or for further processing, excluding institutional consumers.

The sale or offering for sale of inedible eggs as defined in the grades adopted by the Commissioner is prohibited except that incubated eggs may be sold for commercial purposes other than for human consumption provided such incubated eggs are marked, packaged, and disposed of in a manner approved by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-602; 1952, c. 308; 1956, c. 284; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-767; 1968, c. 142, § 3.1-763.16; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5303.
Requirements for eggs sold as fresh or with similar description.

The term “fresh eggs,” or any legend, symbol, picture, representation or device declaring or tending to convey the impression that the eggs are fresh may be applied only to eggs meeting the requirements of grade A quality or better as established by the Board for fresh eggs.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-599; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-764; 1968, c. 142; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5304.
Labeling and advertising.

No label, container, display, or advertisement of eggs shall contain incorrect, fraudulent, or misleading representations. No person shall advertise eggs for sale unless the unabbreviated grade and size-weight class, quality, or other required terms are conspicuously designated in letters at least half as high as the tallest letter in the word “eggs” or the tallest figure in the price, whichever is larger.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-763.17; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5305.
Certain producers exempt from law.

Producers selling a total of 150 dozen eggs or less per week produced by their own hens, or eggs purchased from other producers not to exceed 60 dozen per week are exempt from this law provided all eggs are of edible quality and of the quality as represented.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-600; 1956, c. 284; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-765; 1968, c. 142; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to agricultural exemptions under the retail sales and use tax, see §

58.1-609.2

.

As to agricultural exemptions under the litter tax, see §

58.1-1707

.

§ 3.2-5306.
Enforcement of chapter; how eggs marked and quality determined; requirements.

This chapter shall be enforced by the Commissioner and all eggs sold or offered for sale except those exempted in §

3.2-5305

shall be marked according to the grades, sizes, quality, ungraded or cracked and other required terms adopted by the Commissioner with the approval of the Board and shall conform to the standards established for the grade, size, ungraded or cracked as labeled. Official determination of the quality of all eggs outlined in this chapter shall be by candling.

Eggs moving into private or cooperative packing plants, which are first receivers, where they will be candled and graded, need not be marked.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-601, 3-603; 1952, c. 308; 1956, c. 284; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-766, 3.1-768; 1968, c. 142; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5307.
Seller invoice; requirements.

Any person selling or delivering eggs to restaurants, hotels, retail stores, bakeries or other institution purchasing eggs for serving to guests, patrons, employees or inmates shall furnish the purchaser with an invoice showing the name and address of the seller and the quantity, grade, and size of such eggs. If the eggs are ungraded, such fact shall appear on the invoice. A copy of such invoice shall be retained by the seller and purchaser for not less than 30 days.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-603.1; 1956, c. 284; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-769; 1968, c. 142; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5308.
Sanitation and related matters.

Any person assembling, transporting, processing, holding, or offering for sale eggs destined for a consumer or an institutional consumer shall provide and maintain a satisfactory relative humidity. In addition, any container, including the packaging material therein or associated therewith, shall be clean and free from foreign odor.

The Board shall by regulations, provide for the keeping, processing, transporting, and the sale of eggs under sanitary conditions.

Nothing in this chapter or in any regulations of the Board shall be construed to exempt any persons or premises from the application of any laws otherwise applicable and relating to the operation of establishments or facilities for the storing, transporting, sale, distribution, preparation, or serving of food.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-769.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5309.
Stop-sale order and seizure.

If after inspection, the Department determines that any eggs are being offered, displayed, stored, processed, or transported in violation of this chapter, the Department may issue a stop-sale order as to such eggs directed to the owner or custodian thereof. Such order shall specify the reason for its issuance and shall detail the character of the violation. No eggs to which a stop-sale order applies shall be marketed until and unless the order has been withdrawn. The Department shall withdraw a stop-sale order only upon its determination that the conditions leading to the issuance of the order have been corrected.

Whenever the public interest requires, the Department may take possession or custody of the eggs against which a stop-sale order has been issued and may commence proceedings for the seizure thereof. Upon seizure and proof of violation, the eggs shall be disposed of in such manner as may be consistent with the public safety and interest. The owner or custodian of the eggs shall not be entitled to any compensation or damages on account of such seizure or disposition.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-769.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5310.
Right of entry.

The Commissioner may enter during normal business hours on or into any premises or any vehicle wherein eggs are bought, stored, sold, offered for sale, processed, or transported, or wherein the Commissioner has reason to believe that any such activity is carried on, in order to inspect and examine eggs, egg containers, any equipment, facilities or records pertinent to the conduct of activities subject to this chapter or regulations implementing the same, or to ascertain the state of compliance with any order issued by the Department pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-769.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5311.
Adopting regulations.

The Board may adopt regulations to administer this chapter.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-769.4; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5312.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-604; 1952, c. 308; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-770; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5313.
Injunction.

The Department acting by the Attorney General or local prosecutor may enforce any provision of this chapter or any regulation issued pursuant thereto by injunction.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-770.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5314.
Remedies not exclusive.

The institution of proceedings for the application of any remedy, or the issuance of any order on account thereof, or the imposition of any fine or penalty pursuant to this chapter shall not operate as a bar or limitation to the application of any other remedy available pursuant to this chapter or any other applicable law.

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-770.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5315.
Judicial review.

Any determination of final actions of the Department taken pursuant to this chapter shall be reviewable in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1968, c. 142, § 3.1-770.3; 1986, c. 615; 2008, c. 860.